Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Boards of Elections
117.055.
Division
of county into precincts — Maps — Failure of board to perform duty — Coordination of precinct boundary changes with other boundaries.

Subject to KRS

117.0551

to

117.0555

:

Each county shall be divided into election precincts by the county board of elections. Each election precinct shall be composed of contiguous and, as nearly as practicable, compact areas having clearly definable boundaries and wholly contained within any larger district. The county board of elections shall establish precincts so that no boundary of a precinct crosses the boundary of:

The Commonwealth;

A county or urban-county;

A congressional district;

A state senatorial district;

A state representative district;

A justice of the peace or county commissioner’s district established under KRS Chapter 67; or

An aldermanic ward established under KRS

83.440

.

The county board of elections shall have the authority to draw precinct lines so as to enable more than one (1) precinct to vote at one (1) location. The county board of elections shall review election precinct boundaries as often as necessary. Without exception, they shall review the boundaries of all election precincts exceeding seven hundred (700) votes cast in the last regular election prior to each primary election, and the State Board of Elections may require a written report at least sixty (60) days prior to the candidate filing deadline set forth in KRS 118.165(1) and (2) on each election precinct exceeding seven hundred (700) votes cast in the last regular election. Consideration to the division of said election precincts should be based on the anticipated growth factor within the specified boundaries; however, the county board of elections shall not be prohibited from dividing election precincts in excess of seven hundred (700) votes cast in the last regular election or less than seven hundred (700) votes cast in the last regular election if they elect to do so. However, the State Board of Elections may, in its discretion, withhold from a county the expenses of an election under KRS

117.345

for any precinct containing more than one thousand five hundred (1,500) registered voters, excluding those precincts utilizing optical scan voting equipment and those periods of time in which the precinct boundaries have been frozen under KRS

117.056

.

No election precinct shall be created, divided, abolished, or consolidated or the boundaries therein changed prior to any primary to comply with the provisions of KRS

117.055

to

117.055

5 and KRS

117.0557

later than the last date prescribed by election law generally for filing notification and declaration forms with the county clerk or Secretary of State. No election precinct shall be created, divided, abolished, or consolidated or the boundaries therein changed prior to any regular election to comply with the provisions of KRS 117.055 to

117.0555

and KRS

117.0557

later than the last date prescribed by election law generally for filing certificates or petitions of nomination with the county clerk or Secretary of State.

The county board of elections shall designate the name or number and the boundaries of the election precincts. Each precinct shall contain, as nearly as practicable, an equal number of voters, based on the number of registered voters in the county.

A map and listing of the exact election precinct boundaries shall be filed by the county board of elections with the State Board of Elections, and any changes in boundaries thereafter made shall also be filed with the State Board of Elections. A copy of this map indicating all precinct boundaries within the county shall be included in the election supplies of each precinct.

If the county board of elections fails to perform any of the duties required by KRS

117.055

to

117.055

5 and KRS

117.0557

:

The State Board of Elections or any citizen and voter of the county may apply to the Circuit Court of the county for a summary mandatory order requiring the board to perform the duty. Appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals by either party; and

The State Board of Elections shall not submit claims for payments to the county under KRS

117.343

and

117.345

until the State Board of Elections determines in writing that the duty has been performed.

The county board of elections shall coordinate all precinct boundary changes with the affected school board, magisterial, and municipal boundaries.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 22; 1976, ch. 135, § 1; 1976, ch. 333, § 1; 1980, ch. 157, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 394, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 44, § 3, effective March 2, 1984; 1992, ch. 430, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2019 ch. 187, § 13, effective November 6, 2019; 2021 ch. 197, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although the board, if possible, should avoid splitting
magisterial district lines, it is not required to do so and may combine two
precincts in different magisterial districts into one precinct where necessary
to comply with the terms of this section regarding voter distribution. OAG
74-544; modified by

OAG 77-126

.

The requirement of KRS

25.700

(repealed) that no boundary
line of a justice district shall cross the boundary line of an election precinct
in no way controls the realignment of precinct boundaries by the county board
of elections.

OAG 74-544

; modified by

OAG 77-126

.

Where a school division line bisects a precinct, the
county board of elections and the school board should work together in determining
the actual location of the eligible voters in each school division who will
be voting in a particular precinct and the school board should assist the
clerk by furnishing him with such a breakdown since the school board is in
a better position to know the location of the school boundary lines and the
board should also furnish the clerk with a map showing the school boundary
lines so that the clerk can, in turn, determine in which school division within
the split precinct the voters reside and thereby mark the registration list
that goes to the precinct in such a manner as to enable the election officers
to set the machine correctly before each voter proceeds to vote.

OAG 76-367

.

A change in precinct boundaries and the reapportionment
of magisterial districts are in no way connected in point of time and, as
a consequence, there is no requirement that one be initiated before the other.

OAG 76-745

.

Where precinct lines coincide a single voting place
may be established in one place to permit the voters in both precincts to
vote at the same place.

OAG 77-43

.

In view of the 1976 amendment to this section and
the requirement that magisterial district lines shall not bisect precinct
lines found under KRS

25.700

(repealed), the reapportionment commissioners
and the county board of elections should make a concerted effort to see that
precinct boundary lines and magisterial boundary lines comply with the respective
statutes and due to the fact that the magisterial boundary lines must comply
with the equal population factor under the “one man, one vote”
rule it would be easier for the county board of elections to change the precinct
lines so as to coincide with the magisterial district lines after the county
has been reapportioned.

OAG 77-126

, modifying

OAG 74-544

.

This section would permit only one voting place in
any one precinct, though such voting place could be utilized by a number of
precincts where it is located on or near joining precinct lines.

OAG 77-554

.

A county board, in its discretion, may create a new
voting precinct composed of an annexed territory where it deems necessary
to do so, so long as it is done not less than 55 days before the May primary.

OAG 79-99

.

It is mandatory for the county board of elections
to review the boundaries of a precinct exceeding 700 voters, but the county
board of elections may give permission to exceed 700 voters in a registered
precinct and still be within the law.

OAG 79-298

.

A county election board may relocate a precinct county
line, so as to place a country club entirely within one “wet”
precinct before a local option election is held in a second precinct containing
half the club where the change would be wholly within the boundary of one
magisterial or commissioners’ district and would not affect the precinct location
of any voter.

OAG 79-609

.

No precinct boundary line can cross a magisterial
boundary line which is the political territory having the less area within
the county’s boundaries with the exception of municipal boundaries.

OAG 79-609

.

After reapportionment involving changes from the prior
reapportionment, it is the responsibility of the county board of elections
to so draw or redraw precinct boundary lines so that no precinct line bisects
or crosses a magisterial line, as last established under reapportionment,
but the precinct lines are irrelevant as concerns reapportionment itself.

OAG 80-69

.

The 1980 Legislature amended this section to change
the method of determining the size of the precincts by eliminating the requirement
that it be based on the number of registered voters and providing in its place
that it shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last regular
election.

OAG 80-378

.

The size of election precincts must be based on the
number of votes cast at the last regular election rather than the number of
registered voters within the precinct.

OAG 80-527

.

The establishment of magisterial districts is done
by the work of the commissioners of reapportionment as finally treated by
fiscal court ordinance. The coordination of precinct boundaries with magisterial
districts is the separate burden of the county board of elections under this
section.

OAG 82-451

.

A location of one voting place in a city to serve
several adjacent precincts would be perfectly proper so long as the actual
voting would be held in separate rooms for each precinct.

OAG 82-511

.

Where a new districting plan included a city plus
some additional area within the magisterial district, since the city could
divide its area into a number of precincts, the board could establish one
voting place at the courthouse or any other location that was reasonably close
to the precinct lines where the voters of all such precints could vote. OAG
82-511.

Where a fiscal court adopts a plan for reapportionment
of magisterial districts that meets the provisions of KRS

67.045

, yet divides
one or more voting precincts, since both the reapportionment act, KRS

67.045

,
and this section, prohibit a precinct line from bisecting or crossing a magisterial
district line and particularly following reapportionment as required by KRS 67.045, following reapportionment the county board of elections must alter
any precinct that has been crossed by virtue of reapportionment in order to
conform with the requirements of KRS 67.045 and this section.

OAG 82-617

;

OAG 82-621

.

This section prohibits the fiscal court from changing
the present precinct boundary lines until the Kentucky General Assembly has
enacted redistricting legislation; the county board of elections has the exclusive
authority to alter precinct boundaries rather than the fiscal court.

OAG 91-55

.

Where the written description with regard to precinct
boundaries did not correspond with the precinct map, the map is the primary
document with regard to precinct boundaries. However, if there is a serious
discrepancy this would be a factual question which this office cannot answer
and which would require a determination by the court.

OAG 91-55

.

Under this section, lines are to be drawn by the county
board of elections and the reapportionment commission has no authority to
establish a precinct boundary.

OAG 92-58

.

117.0551.
Boundaries
of precincts.

A county board of elections shall establish election precincts so that each boundary of each precinct follows:

A boundary described in KRS 117.055(1);

The boundary of an incorporated city;

A boundary of an urban-county legislative district established under KRS Chapter 67A;

A boundary of a school district or school district division established under KRS Chapter 160; or

A boundary of a census tract or census block established by the United States Bureau of the Census for the most recent decennial census of population and appearing on census block boundary maps.

If a county board of elections cannot establish a precinct that complies with KRS

117.055

by using the boundaries permitted under subsection (1) of this section, the county board of elections may either:

Establish the precinct boundary by using a boundary following a visible feature, including but not limited to a highway, railroad, or stream, and an extension of that visible feature to, but not across, another visible feature, nor across an extension of another feature that is used as a precinct boundary; or

Request an exemption under KRS

117.055

3 and

117.0554

.

For purposes of this section, a “visible feature” is a physical feature shown on official maps prepared by:

The Kentucky Transportation Cabinet;

The United States Geological Survey; or

The United States Bureau of the Census.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

117.0552.
Procedure
for establishing precincts.

As used in KRS

117.055

to

117.055

5 and KRS

117.0557

, “establish a precinct” shall include the following:

Creating a new precinct;

Dividing one (1) precinct into two (2) or more precincts;

Combining two (2) or more precincts into one (1) precinct; and

Altering a boundary line between two (2) or more precincts.

Each county board of elections shall establish precincts by issuing a proposed precinct establishment order. Each proposed precinct establishment order shall be submitted to the executive director of the State Board of Elections for approval.

The order prescribed in subsection (2) of this section shall include:

A written description of the boundaries of each precinct to be established;

A map or maps clearly showing the boundaries of each precinct to be established;

The estimated number of registered voters in each precinct to be established; and

Any additional information which may be required by an administrative regulation adopted by the State Board of Elections under KRS Chapter 13A for the purposes of assuring compliance with KRS

117.055

to

117.055

5 and KRS

117.0557

.

If a proposed precinct establishment order includes a description of a precinct with a boundary that follows the boundary of an entity referred to in KRS 117.0551(1), the order shall include the following:

A description that precisely identifies the boundary line; and

A notation on the map of the precinct indicating that the boundary is that of an entity referred to in KRS 117.0551(1) and naming the specific entity.

If a proposed precinct establishment order includes a description of a precinct boundary that follows one or more visible features, the order shall include a description that precisely identifies each feature that forms the precinct boundary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

117.0553.
Review
and approval of precinct establishment order — Resubmission of returned
orders.

The executive director of the State Board of Elections or his designee shall examine each proposed precinct establishment order submitted under KRS

117.055

2 to determine if the order would establish precincts in compliance with KRS

117.055

to

117.0552

.

If the executive director or his designee determines that the proposed precinct establishment order would comply with KRS

117.055

to

117.055

2, the executive director shall approve the proposed precinct establishment order no later than thirty (30) days after its receipt by the executive director. The order shall become effective upon the executive director’s approval unless the order contains a different effective date.

If the executive director or his designee determines that the proposed precinct establishment order would not comply with KRS

117.055

to

117.055

2, the executive director shall return the proposed precinct establishment order to the county board of elections no later than thirty (30) days after he receives the proposed order. The order shall be accompanied by a letter from the executive director indicating specifically how the order would not comply with KRS 117.055 to

117.0552

.

If a proposed precinct establishment order is returned to a county board of elections under this section, the board may:

Amend the proposed order so that the precincts may be established in compliance with KRS

117.055

to

117.055

2; or

Request an exemption under KRS

117.0554

; or

Request a hearing under KRS

117.0555

.

The county board of elections shall resubmit the proposed order to the executive director of the State Board of Elections with the amendment, request for an exemption, or request for a hearing. If the proposed order is resubmitted with an amendment, the executive director or his designee shall review and act upon the amended proposal in accordance with subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

117.0554.
Request
for exemption — Procedure.

When a proposed precinct establishment order has been returned to the county board of elections under KRS

117.055

3, and the county board of elections has determined that the noncompliance described by the executive director cannot be corrected by the establishment of a precinct that complies with the provisions of KRS

117.055

to

117.0552

, the county board of elections may request the State Board of Elections to grant an exemption.

The State Board of Elections shall conduct a hearing on the exemption request. If the State Board of Elections determines that the noncompliance described by the executive director cannot be corrected by the establishment of a precinct that complies with all provisions of KRS

117.055

to

117.055

2, the board shall grant the exemption.

If the State Board of Elections grants the exemption, the county board of elections shall amend the proposed precinct establishment order to establish precinct boundaries:

In accordance with the exemption granted by the State Board of Elections;

That comply with all other requirements established by KRS

117.055

to

117.055

2; and

That are precisely described in the order.

The county board of elections shall submit the amended order to the State Board of Elections. If the State Board of Elections finds that the proposed order, as amended, complies with subsection (3) of this section, it shall approve the order. The order shall become effective upon its approval by the State Board of Elections unless the order contains a different effective date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

117.0555.
Hearing
on returned order believed by county board to be in compliance.

If the county board of elections
believes that the proposed order returned under KRS

117.055

3(3) complies with
KRS

117.055

to

117.0552

, the county board may resubmit the order to the executive
director and request a hearing before the State Board of Elections. If the
State Board of Elections determines that the proposed precinct establishment
order complies with KRS 117.055 to

117.0552

, the State Board of Elections
shall make a written finding of fact that the order complies with KRS 117.055
to 117.0552 and shall approve the order. The order shall become effective
upon its approval by the State Board of Elections unless the order contains
a different effective date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

117.0556.
Information
to be supplied to Legislative Research Commission — Opportunity for
comment.

For the purposes of implementing
KRS

7.550

:

The State Board of Elections shall provide the Legislative Research Commission:

A copy of each proposed precinct establishment order submitted under KRS

117.0552

;

A copy of each request for an exemption filed under KRS

117.0553

and

117.0554

;

Notice of the time and place of any hearing on a request for an exemption held under KRS

117.0554

; and

A copy of each precinct establishment order approved under KRS

117.0553

to

117.0555

.

The Legislative Research Commission or its designee shall be given an opportunity to comment upon any proposed order or request for an exemption made under KRS

117.0553

to

117.0555

prior to the State Board of Elections’ approval of the order or decision on the request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 8, effective July 14, 1992.

117.0557.
Schedule
of actions for compliance with KRS 117.055 and 117.0551.

Not later than January 1, 1995,
the boundaries of all election precincts in the Commonwealth shall comply
with KRS

117.055

and

117.055

1, and all county boards of elections shall have
filed with the State Board of Elections maps and descriptions of precinct
boundaries that provide the information required by KRS 117.055 and

117.0552

.
For the purpose of implementing this section:

By July 15, 1993, the State Board of Elections, in consultation with the Legislative Research Commission, shall review the boundaries of all precincts in effect on July 14, 1992, to determine whether or not the boundaries comply with KRS

117.055

and

117.055

1. If the State Board of Elections finds that a precinct boundary does not comply with KRS 117.055 and

117.0551

, it shall so notify the county board of elections in writing.

By July 15, 1993, the State Board of Elections, in consultation with the Legislative Research Commission, shall review the maps and descriptions of precinct boundaries on file with the State Board of Elections to determine if the boundaries of all precincts in effect on July 14, 1992, are described and mapped in a manner that provides the information required by KRS

117.055

and

117.055

2. If the State Board of Elections finds that the information on file does not provide the information required by KRS 117.055 and

117.0552

, it shall so notify the county board of elections in writing.

If a county board of elections receives notice under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, it shall prepare a proposed precinct establishment order to establish a precinct boundary in compliance with KRS

117.055

and

117.055

1, or provide a map and description of the precinct boundary in compliance with KRS 117.055 and

117.0552

, or both, not later than July 15, 1994. The proposed precinct establishment order shall be processed in the manner prescribed by KRS

117.0552

to

117.0555

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

117.056.
Maintenance
of boundaries of election precincts.

The provisions of KRS

117.055

notwithstanding, the county boards of elections shall maintain the boundaries of election precincts from January 1 of each year ending in “0” until the termination of the next following regular or extraordinary session of the General Assembly which enacts congressional and state legislative redistricting legislation following receipt of the decennial United States Census of Population.

If any county board of elections fails to perform the duty placed upon it by subsection (1) of this section, the State Board of Elections shall apply to the Circuit Court of the county for a writ of mandamus requiring the county board to perform this duty.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 319, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2001, ch. 122, § 1, effective March 19, 2001; 2020 ch. 78, § 1, effective April 7, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where the written description with regard to precinct
boundaries did not correspond with the precinct map, the map is the primary
document with regard to precinct boundaries. However, if there is a serious
discrepancy this would be a factual question which this office cannot answer
but would require a determination by the court.

OAG 91-55

.

117.057.
Maintenance
of current boundaries of election precincts. [Repealed.]

117.058.
Legislative
approval for certain boundary changes.

The county board of elections
shall not add territory to, delete territory from, or otherwise change the
boundary of any congressional, representative, or senatorial district without
legislative approval to redefine the district in the form of a legislative
act changing the district’s boundaries. Nothing in this section shall be deemed
to prohibit the consolidation, creation or division of precincts within legislative
and congressional district boundaries under KRS

117.055

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 394, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 470, § 7, effective July 15, 1986.

117.065.
Establishing
voting places for precincts — Change — Expense — Authority
to designate as voting places buildings constructed with tax revenues —
Voter accessibility — Immediate telephone accessibility.

The county board of elections shall, not later than September 20 of each year, establish the voting place for each precinct. If a change becomes necessary after that date, notice of change shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. If a change becomes necessary on election day, notice shall be posted at the former voting place. The expense of renting voting places, for which rent of not less than twenty dollars ($20) shall be paid, shall be paid in the same manner as other election expenses.

The county board of elections shall have the authority to designate as voting places, without cost to the board, buildings constructed in whole or in part with tax revenues.

The county board of elections shall designate as voting places only those places which are accessible to all eligible voters, including those with physical limitations and the elderly.

The county board of elections shall ensure that each precinct polling place in the county has immediate access to a telephone within the polling place on the day of any election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 23; 1976, ch. 135, § 2; 1980, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 394, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was
amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 394 and 416 which do not appear to be in conflict
and have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The expenses of opening schools to serve as voting
places on a presidential election day as provided by subsection (2) of this
section when the schools are mandated to be closed by KRS

2.190

would be so
small and incidental as not to be proscribed by Const., §§ 180,
184, 186.

OAG 76-592

, withdrawing

OAG 42-363

.

Since the requirement that schools not be opened without
a custodian is a policy created by school board and not by statute, the circumstances
surrounding the use of schools as voting places as provided for in subsection
(2) of this section may be structured so that there does not exist any unwarranted
and impermissible expenditure of public common school money for election purposes.

OAG 76-614

.

This section requires the county board of elections
to establish a voting place “for” each precinct; although this
section previously used the word “in” instead of “for”
it would still appear that the voting place established for a particular precinct
should be located therein if at all possible; however, the county board may
draw precinct lines so as to enable more than one precinct to vote at one
particular location so that a voting place may be established in an adjacent
precinct that is on or near the adjoining precinct line thereby serving two
precincts.

OAG 78-698

.

A location of one voting place in a city to serve
several adjacent precincts would be perfectly proper so long as the actual
voting would be held in separate rooms for each precinct.

OAG 82-511

.

Where a new districting plan included a city plus
some additional area within the magisterial district, since the city could
divide its area into a number of precincts, the board could establish one
voting place at the courthouse or any other location that was reasonably close
to the precinct lines where the voters of all such precincts could vote. OAG
82-511.

117.066.
Single voting location for more than one precinct — Petition to allow consolidation of precincts.

The county board of elections may, pursuant to KRS

117.055

and subsection (3) of this section, designate a single voting location for more than one (1) precinct if the voting location is equipped with voting equipment capable of providing or accepting separate ballots without endangering the integrity of the ballots or without violating any other election law.

If a single voting location for more than one (1) precinct is approved under subsection (3) of this section, the primary or election shall be conducted as follows:

One (1) voting equipment may be used for more than one (1) precinct if ballots are tabulated for each separate precinct, and if separate ballots may be placed upon any voting equipment to be used without endangering the integrity of the ballots or without violating any other election law. Otherwise, separate voting equipment shall be used for each precinct. In the instance of a precinct which has a small number of voters such that the use of separate voting equipment would be cost-prohibitive, the county clerk may make application to the State Board of Elections to use supplemental paper ballots under KRS

118.215

to conduct the voting for the small precinct on any primary or election day. If the use of supplemental paper ballots is approved by the State Board of Elections, at the close of voting on any primary or election day, the locked supplemental paper ballot box shall be transported to the county board of elections along with the federal provisional ballot receptacle, and ballots shall be counted by the county board of elections as provided by KRS 117.275(10) to (16);

Separate precinct voter rosters shall be maintained for each precinct, and steps shall be taken to ensure that voters cast their ballot in their duly authorized precinct; and

A separate set of election forms and reports required by this chapter and the State Board of Elections shall be maintained for each precinct.

The county board of elections may petition the State Board of Elections to allow the consolidation of precincts and the consolidation of precinct election officers at any voting location where voters of more than one (1) precinct vote. The petition shall be on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A and shall include:

A list of all precincts designated to vote at the voting location;

The address and type of facility of the voting location;

The number and type of voting systems or voting equipment to be used at the voting location;

The number of registered voters in each precinct designated to vote at the voting location;

An explanation of the reasons why the consolidation is desirable;

The plan for additional precinct officers at the voting location, the manner in which they will be assigned, and whether the voting location will be fully staffed with election officials;

The plan for how the county clerk will publicize the location for where the voting shall occur, in addition to how each location shall be noted conspicuously to residents of the county as a “Vote Center”; and

The plan for how the voting location will serve as a focal point to meet the needs of a diverse community.

If the petition submitted under subsection (3) of this section is approved by the State Board of Elections, the precinct election officers designated to serve as election officers for more than one (1) precinct shall meet the eligibility requirements of KRS

117.045

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 10, effective April 13, 1992; 2002, ch. 129, § 3, effective April 2, 2002; 2008, ch. 129, § 13, effective July 15, 2008; 2020 ch. 89, § 4, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 10, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 5, effective April 7, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010). A reference to “KRS

117.275

(7)” in subsection (2)(a) of this statute has been changed in codification to “KRS

117.275

(10) to (13).”
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 176, sec. 8, renumbered and subdivided the former subsection (7) of
KRS 117.275 as subsections (10), (11), (12), and (13), but failed to include a conforming amendment to the reference in subsection (2)(a) of this statute. This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1).